Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 2 Jurisdiction, Powers, and Duties Generally
46-2-25.2.
Sixteen-mile toll-free telephone calling; modification of rate schedules; recovery of expenses or lost revenues by telephone companies; rate-making power of Public Service Commission not affected.

It is the goal of this Code section to provide for toll-free calling between two telephones where the central offices serving such telephones are within 16 miles of each other.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, on and after July 1, 1992, the Public Service Commission shall not approve any new rate schedule which authorizes a long-distance charge for calls between two telephones where the central offices serving such telephones are within 16 miles of each other.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, on and after July 1, 1992, rate schedules approved by the Public Service Commission prior to July 1, 1992, shall be amended so as to reduce by one-half the long-distance charge for calls between two telephones where the central offices serving such telephones are within 16 miles of each other.

On or before July 1, 1993, the Public Service Commission shall conduct hearings and accept evidence and upon consideration of such evidence shall determine any further reductions in long-distance charges for calls between two telephones where the central offices serving such telephones are within 16 miles of each other. Such determination shall consider the availability of funds and other revenue sources to affected companies to offset the costs associated with such further reductions.

All rate schedules approved pursuant to this Code section may be modified at the discretion of the Public Service Commission upon a good and sufficient showing of geographic, economic, or technological infeasibility by a telephone company.

All rate schedules approved pursuant to this Code section shall take into account the following:

The reasonable cost of providing such service to customers of the telephone company throughout the entire service area of such telephone company and the increased value resulting from such expanded calling areas; and

The reasonable rate of return on investment authorized in the rate schedule approved by the Public Service Commission for such telephone company.

Any telephone company seeking to recover any portion of its expenses or lost toll revenues resulting from the implementation of the 16 mile toll free calling plan contained in this Code section shall demonstrate its financial hardship to the Public Service Commission before such recovery shall be allowed. It shall be within the discretion of the Public Service Commission to determine the methodology and source of recovery for any such affected telephone company. In determining the method of offsetting the costs associated with the 16 mile plan, the Public Service Commission shall first utilize any available earnings at the telephone companies seeking assistance in excess of those authorized in their respective tariffs. Such methodology and source for offsetting costs shall include but not be limited to recovery from the Universal Service Fund as permitted under Code Section 50-5-200.

Nothing in this Code section shall be interpreted as amending, modifying, or repealing Code Section 46-2-23, relating to the rate-making power of the Public Service Commission generally and special provisions concerning telecommunications companies.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-2-25.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 480, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 46.

The 2004 amendment,

effective May 13, 2004, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Code Section 50-5-200, referred to in this Code section, was repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1015, § 10.

46-2-25.3.
Toll-free calls within 22 miles of exchange; hearings; “net gain” defined.

On and after June 1, 1998, there shall be toll-free calling between two telephones within a 22 mile radius of an exchange serving such telephones as such 22 mile calling areas are designated on maps on file with the commission in any local exchange as provided in subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section; provided, however, that the provisions of this Code section shall not apply to a subscriber who has elected an optional plan. Such calls made in the 22 mile radius shall be considered local calls. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the offer of optional rate plans.

For each telephone company which has not elected to have its rates, terms, and conditions for services determined pursuant to the alternative regulation provided for in Article 4 of Chapter 5 of this title, the Public Service Commission may conduct hearings and accept evidence and, upon consideration of such evidence, shall determine if any telephone company should be authorized to increase its rates for basic exchange service to cover the reasonable costs of providing such toll-free service to customers of the telephone company throughout the 22 mile calling areas and to continue a reasonable rate of return on investment authorized in the rate schedule previously approved by the Public Service Commission for such telephone company. Such determination shall consider the availability of funds and other revenue sources to affected companies to offset the costs associated with such toll-free calling areas. It shall be within the discretion of the Public Service Commission to determine the methodology and source of recovery for any such affected telephone company. In determining the method of offsetting the costs associated with the 22 mile plan, the Public Service Commission shall first utilize any available earnings at the telephone companies seeking assistance in excess of those authorized in their respective tariffs. The commission shall be authorized to approve any increase in rates which the commission determines to be necessary to implement and accomplish the toll-free calling requirements of this Code section.

If the rate of increase determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection does not exceed $2.00 or 25 percent of the basic service rate then in effect, the commission shall require the concurrent implementation of a 22 mile toll-free expanded calling area and the increase in basic local exchange service rates for that exchange, and the local exchange company shall be permitted to increase the basic local exchange service rates notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 5 of this title to the contrary.

If the rate of increase determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection exceeds $2.00 or 25 percent of the basic service rate then in effect, the commission shall conduct balloting of the subscribers in each local exchange proposed to receive the 22 mile toll-free expanded calling area service. If a majority of those subscribers who return ballots is in favor of both the service and the requisite increase in basic local exchange service rates, the commission shall require the concurrent implementation of a 22 mile toll-free expanded calling area and the increase in basic local exchange service rates for that exchange, and the local exchange company shall be permitted to increase the basic local exchange service rates notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 5 of this title to the contrary.

For each telephone company which has elected to have its rates, terms, and conditions for services determined pursuant to the alternative regulation provided for in Article 4 of Chapter 5 of this title, the commission shall determine for each local exchange company the increase in rates for basic local exchange services necessary to recover fully all revenues which would be lost if a 22 mile toll-free expanded calling area were implemented in that local exchange.

If the rate of increase determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection does not exceed $2.00 or 25 percent of the basic service rate then in effect, the commission shall require the concurrent implementation of a 22 mile toll-free expanded calling area and the increase in basic local exchange service rates for that exchange, and the local exchange company shall be permitted to increase the basic local exchange service rates notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 5 of this title to the contrary.

If the rate of increase determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection exceeds $2.00 or 25 percent of the basic service rate then in effect, the commission shall conduct balloting of the subscribers in each local exchange proposed to receive the 22 mile toll-free expanded calling area service. If a majority of those subscribers who return ballots is in favor of both the service and the requisite increase in basic local exchange service rates, the commission shall require the concurrent implementation of a 22 mile toll-free expanded calling area and the increase in basic local exchange service rates for that exchange, and the local exchange company shall be permitted to increase the basic local exchange service rates notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 5 of this title to the contrary.

As used in this subsection, the term “net gain” means the net revenue impact from the implementation less costs incurred as a result of the implementation of a 22 mile toll-free calling area.

The commission shall adopt a methodology to provide that any net gain which a telecommunications company experiences as a result of implementing this Code section be passed on to end user customers.

Nothing in this Code section shall be interpreted as amending, modifying, or repealing Code Section 46-2-23, relating to the rate-making power of the Public Service Commission generally and special provisions concerning telecommunications companies, or Article 4 of Chapter 5 of this title, “The Telecommunications and Competition Development Act of 1995.”

History.

Code 1981, §

46-2-25.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1056, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 46.

46-2-26.
Restriction as to utilization of fuel-adjustment tariffs; procedure for rate change by utility based solely on change in fuel costs; extent of commission’s power over rate changes; disclosure requirements for utilities seeking rate change.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Fuel costs” of a utility company means the cost of fuel as defined in the utility company’s tariffs in effect on July 1, 1979, as such tariffs may be changed from time to time by order of the commission as provided by law.

“Utility” means any retail supplier of electricity subject to the rate-making jurisdiction of the commission.

No utility regulated by the commission shall automatically increase any customer’s billing for intrastate utility services by reason of application of any fuel adjustment tariff. Rate changes based solely on increases or decreases in the cost of fuel may be determined as set forth in this Code section. Code Section 46-2-25 shall not apply to proceedings conducted pursuant to this Code section.

On or before May 15, 1979, each utility shall file with the commission an estimate of fuel costs and an estimate of retail sales for the three calendar months beginning on July 1, 1979, and proposed base rate tariffs to recover those costs. Thereafter, a utility may change its base rates solely because of increased or decreased fuel costs only after filing with the commission an estimate of its fuel costs and retail sales for the next three consecutive calendar months and proposed base rates to recover those costs, adjusted as required by subsection (g) of this Code section.

Not less than ten days after any such filings or after a commission show-cause order concerning such base rates, the commission shall conduct a public hearing on the information so filed for the purpose of determining its accuracy. The utility’s testimony shall be under oath and shall, with any corrections thereto, constitute the utility’s affirmative case. At any hearing conducted pursuant to this Code section, the burden of proof to show that an increased rate, based on fluctuations in fuel costs, is just and reasonable shall be upon the utility. Formal intervention by customers of the utility shall be permitted. The staff of the commission and formal intervenors shall have the right to examine all utility records used in the preparation of the testimony and exhibits of the utility, to cross-examine utility witnesses, and to present rebuttal testimony, subject to cross-examination by all parties.

Following such hearing, the commission shall issue an order stating the base rates to be used by the utility during the next three consecutive calendar months, or until changed as provided in this Code section. Should the commission fail or refuse to issue such order by the ninetieth day after the utility’s filing, the base rates proposed by the utility shall thereupon be deemed adopted by operation of law.

Each utility shall compute, record, and report to the commission monthly the most current data available showing the monthly and accumulated overrecovery or underrecovery of actual fuel costs resulting from application of its base rates.

Each base rate amendment shall include an adjustment based on actual expense to date in order that the accumulated retail fuel costs of the utility shall equal, as nearly as possible, the revenues recovered pursuant to the fuel recovery allowance contained in its base rates. The resulting adjustment in the charge, if any, shall be made to the nearest 0.0001¢ per kilowatt hour.

The commission shall disallow and make appropriate adjustment for any reported fuel cost that is the result of illegal or clearly imprudent conduct on the part of the utility.

All commission orders issued pursuant to this Code section shall contain the commission’s findings of fact and conclusions of law upon which the commission’s action is based. Such order shall be deemed a final order subject to judicial review under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

The commission shall not prohibit or limit the operation of a rate schedule or other tariff of a utility to the extent that it permits rate increases or decreases to adjust for increased or decreased purchased power costs, where such increased or decreased purchased power costs shall have become effective under the procedures of a federal regulatory agency or under a contract approved by a federal regulatory agency. Any subsequent refunds received by any such utility with respect to any such increased purchased power costs which become effective under procedures of a federal regulatory agency, or otherwise, shall be refunded by the utility to its customers in the manner directed by the commission.

In filing any estimate of fuel costs under subsection (c) of this Code section, each utility shall disclose the name and address of each person from whom the utility expects to purchase fuel or the transportation of fuel during the period covered by such estimate. Each such filing shall also disclose, when applicable, any financial interest the utility has in any firm or corporation expected to supply or transport fuel to the utility during the period covered by the estimate. It shall be the duty of the commission to make public at each public hearing held pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section any information disclosed by a utility pursuant to the requirements of this subsection. It shall constitute a financial interest within the meaning of this subsection:

For any member of the board of directors of the utility to be a member of the board of directors of a corporation supplying or transporting fuel to the utility;

For any member of the board of directors of the utility to be the proprietor of or a partner in any business supplying or transporting fuel to the utility; or

For any member of the board of directors of the utility, or for the utility itself, to own 10 percent or more of the stock of any corporation supplying or transporting fuel to the utility.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-307.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1312, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 3.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, substituted “ninetieth day” for “forty fifth day” in the last sentence of subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 enactment of this chapter, see 19 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 285 (2002).

46-2-26.1.
Accounting methods to be used by electric utilities in rate-making proceedings.

The accounting treatments specified in this Code section shall apply in any proceeding before the commission to determine the rates to be charged by an electric utility.

In any proceeding to determine the rates to be charged by an electric utility, the electric utility shall file jurisdictionally allocated cost of service data on the basis of a test period, and the commission shall utilize a test period, consisting of actual data for the most recent 12 month period for which data are available, fully adjusted separately to reflect estimated operations during the 12 months following the utility’s proposed effective date of the rates. After the initial filing and until new rates go into effect, the utility shall file actual cost of service data as they become available for each month following the actual data which were filed. The utility shall have the burden of explaining and supporting the reasonableness of all estimates and adjustments contained in its cost of service data.

In any case after March 2, 1981, in which an electric utility transfers partial or total ownership of any electric plant, the electric utility shall return to its ratepayers, in such manner as the commission may prescribe, the ratepayers’ cash contribution to the cost of construction, plus the income taxes paid, accrued, and collected by the electric utility in respect thereof, and a portion of the profit, if any, on such transfer.

The ratepayers’ contribution to the cost of construction shall be determined by first multiplying the amount of construction and preconstruction expenditures included in the rate base by the authorized return allowed by the commission for the electric utility on the jurisdictional rate base during the period or periods such expenditures were included in the rate base, and then subtracting therefrom any carrying costs capitalized in respect of such construction and preconstruction expenditures included in the rate base. In the event an electric utility transfers partial or total ownership of any electric plant after it has commenced commercial operation, the ratepayers’ contribution to the cost of construction shall be reduced in proportion to the remaining life of the electric plant.

The profit, if any, on such transfer shall be allocated between the electric utility and its ratepayers in proportion to their respective contributions to the cost of construction. For the purposes of this calculation, the ratepayers’ contribution shall be determined as provided by paragraph (1) of this subsection. The electric utility’s contribution shall be the cost, including carrying costs, of the transferred electric plant as recorded on the books and records of the electric utility. The amount of profit, if any, shall be determined by deducting the sum of the ratepayers’ and the electric utility’s contributions to the cost of construction from the gross proceeds of the transfer.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-307.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 5.

46-2-26.2.
Tax accounting by utilities in rate-making proceedings.

For purposes of determining a utility’s cost of service in rate-making proceedings, the income tax expense portion shall be calculated on the basis of net income before income taxes. Any difference between income based on the utility’s accounting records and income determined in accordance with United States Internal Revenue Service laws and regulations will be accounted for as required by generally accepted accounting principles governing all businesses.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-307.4, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 5.

46-2-26.3.
Recovery of costs of conversion from oil-burning to coal-burning generating facility; filing of request; public hearing; determination of rate; adjustments.

A utility regulated by the Public Service Commission which has 25 percent or more of its total generating capacity as oil-fired generation and operates any electric generating facility which was in the process of being converted on January 1, 1982, and which will be converted and in commercial operation as a coal-fired facility on or before December 31, 1982, after conversion from oil to coal-fired operation may file with the commission an application to determine the appropriate rate to recover the cost of conversion and to demonstrate the fuel cost savings resulting from said conversion.

For the purposes of this Code section, the following words or terms shall have the following meanings:

“Coal” shall mean coal used as a primary energy source.

“Commission” shall mean the Georgia Public Service Commission.

“Cost of conversion” shall mean costs as determined by the commission to be reasonable and necessary for the conversion of an oil-burning electric generating facility to the burning of coal. Such costs shall include, but not be limited to, engineering, administrative, and legal costs, the cost of environmental studies and control equipment, coal-handling and storage equipment, including rail facilities, equipment and facilities necessary to permit the combustion of coal, the cost of retrofitting or refurbishing boilers to permit the combustion of coal, the cost of on-site and off-site facilities for handling, storing, and disposing of wastes resulting from the combustion of coal, and the cost of all other facilities reasonable and necessary to allow the conversion of an oil-burning electric generating facility to burn coal. Such costs shall also include the reasonable cost of capital for such conversion and for carrying the cost of such conversion until such costs are recovered as provided in this Code section. In no case shall cost of conversion include any costs incurred pursuant to an expansion of an electric generating facility’s generating capacity above the generating capacity of said facility that existed prior to the conversion from oil to coal.

“Cost of conversion” shall not include the amount financed by the company through tax-exempt pollution control bonds, if any, of any portion of the project certified by the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources, or other agency vested with similar authority, to be a pollution control facility and therefore eligible for financing under Section 103 of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations thereunder or other similar law or regulation now or hereafter adopted.

“Fuel cost savings” shall mean the amount of fuel savings to be obtained by operating the facility converted from oil to coal-fired operation during the facility’s first full 12 months of operation using coal as its primary fuel as compared to the operation of such facility on oil, had it been so operated, during the same 12 month period.

“Utility” shall mean any retail supplier of electricity subject to the rate-making jurisdiction of the commission.

Any utility meeting the qualifications under subsection (a) of this Code section may file with the commission a request to establish an appropriate adjustment in its rates and charges in order to recover the costs of conversion of an oil-burning generating facility to coal-fired operation as provided herein. After receipt of such filing, the commission shall hold a public hearing to determine the cost of conversion of the generating facility and the fuel cost savings anticipated. Unless it is determined by the commission that the cost of conversion will be less than the projected fuel cost savings accruing to retail customers over the remaining life of the generating facility, no further action shall be taken by the commission. Upon making such determination that the fuel cost savings exceed the cost of conversion, the commission shall then determine the appropriate rate to recover the cost of conversion as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section.

In determining the appropriate rate, the commission shall consider the cost of conversion, and an appropriate period of time, but not more than seven years, to amortize such cost. The appropriate rate shall be an amount which is not less than the amount necessary to amortize the cost of conversion, as herein defined over a period of not more than seven years on a per kilowatt-hour basis taking into consideration the estimated kilowatt hours to be generated for sale by the utility during the first full 12 months in operation of the facility. In determining the rate to recover the cost of conversion, the commission shall permit recovery by the utility of the cost of conversion net of such federal, state, or local taxes based on revenue and income which may be imposed upon the utility for receipt of proceeds of the fuel-savings-allocation which cannot be reasonably avoided by the utility using due diligence. All revenues derived through the rate herein provided shall be applied solely to the cost of conversion of said facility.

The utility shall compute, record, and report to the commission monthly the amount collected under any rate herein authorized and the amount applied to the cost of conversion and the balance remaining to be recovered.

Upon recovery by the utility of the cost of conversion as herein provided, the utility shall no longer charge any rate authorized to recover the cost of conversion. Upon such termination, the utility shall file a report with the commission within 30 days, sworn to by an officer of the utility, that its fuel-savings-allocation revenues are in compliance with all commission orders issued pursuant to this Code section. In the event such revenue is lesser or greater than the utility’s cost of conversion, the commission shall make such determinations and issue such orders as are necessary to result in the full recovery, but no more, of the cost of conversion.

In the event the utility should become entitled, by reason of the conversion, to any federal or state grant and receive same, the commission shall make such determinations and issue such orders as are necessary to reduce the amount of conversion costs which the utility would otherwise recover by means of the rate provided herein. If such grant is received after termination of such adjustment, the utility shall promptly report such receipt and the commission shall make such determinations and issue such orders as are necessary to result in the utility receiving no more than the cost of conversion after taking into account such grant.

Once the utility charges the rate to recover the cost of conversion, the commission shall not recognize for rate-making purposes any costs of conversion which are recovered by the utility through the rate provided herein.

At any hearing or any proceeding under this Code section formal intervention by customers of the utility shall be permitted. All commission orders issued pursuant to this Code section shall be rendered within 180 days from the date of any filing or the institution of any proceeding hereunder and shall contain, unless waived by all parties, the commission’s findings of fact and conclusions of law upon which the commission’s action is based. Such order shall be deemed a final order subject to judicial review under Chapter 13 of Title 50, known as the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

Any recovery of costs of conversion provided or allowed hereunder shall not affect the recovery of fuel costs provided in Code Section 46-2-26.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-307.5, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 412, § 1; Code 1981, §

46-2-26.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 412, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 9; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 46; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 46; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 46/SB 340; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 36/SB 148.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted the extra subsection (b) designation preceding subparagraph (3)(A).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (f), deleted “and the consumers’ utility counsel” following “file a report with the commission” near the beginning of the second sentence.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “consumers’ utility counsel” was substituted for “Consumers’ Utility Counsel” in subsection (f).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act is applicable to taxable years ending on or after March 11, 1987, and that a taxpayer with a taxable year ending on or after January 1, 1987, and before March 11, 1987, may elect to have the provisions of that Act apply.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, also provided that tax, penalty, and interest liabilities and refund eligibility for prior taxable years shall not be affected by that Act.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, also provided that provisions of the federal Tax Reform Act of 1986 and of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 which as of January 1, 1987, were not yet effective become effective for purposes of Georgia taxation on the same dates as they become effective for federal purposes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 36/SB 148, effective July 1, 2015, purported to revise this Code section but only amended subsection (f).

46-2-26.4.
Accounting procedures in gas utility rate proceedings.

The accounting treatments specified in this Code section shall apply in any proceeding before the commission to determine the rates to be charged by a gas utility.

In any proceeding commenced after April 1, 2002, to determine the rates to be charged by a gas utility, the gas utility shall file jurisdictionally allocated cost of service data on the basis of a test period, and the commission shall utilize a test period, consisting of actual data for the most recent 12 month period for which data are available, fully adjusted separately to reflect estimated operations during the 12 months following the proposed effective date of the rates. After the initial filing, and until new rates go into effect, the utility shall file actual cost of service data as they become available for each month following the actual data which were filed. The utility shall have the burden of explaining and supporting the reasonableness of all estimates and adjustments contained in its cost of service data.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-2-26.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1705, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 4.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, in the first sentence of subsection (b), inserted “commenced after April 1, 2002,” near the beginning and substituted “12 months following the” for “12 month period commencing five months from the” near the end.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 enactment of this chapter, see 19 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 285 (2002).